Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Article 2. Breeders

§ 29-7-201.
Owner of male animal to have lien on female animal and offspring.

The owner of a male animal shall have a lien upon any female animal bred to the male and also upon any offspring begotten by the male for the sum stipulated to be paid for the service.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 74, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2861; C.S. 1910, § 3771; C.S. 1920, § 4820; R.S. 1931, § 66-301; C.S. 1945, § 56-1601; W.S. 1957, § 11-491; W.S. 1977, § 11-28-301; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 29-7-107; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 2; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

§ 29-7-202.
Notice of lien to be filed; time and place; form; filing by county clerk; release; renewal.

A notice of a breeder’s lien shall within ninety (90) days after the date of the service be filed in the office of the secretary of state. The notice shall be in the following format:

Notice of Breeder's Lien The State of Wyoming County of
ss. I, , being first duly sworn, upon my oath depose and say I am the lawful owner (or duly authorized agent of the lawful owner) of (description of male animal). On (or between) the day of , A.D. (year) and the day of , (year), the services of the male animal were had upon the following described female animals: The above services were rendered at the request of (for and on behalf of ), the lawful owner of the female animals. The fee agreed upon for these services was dollars. There is now due to from for these services, the sum of dollars. Ninety (90) days have not elapsed since the date of the services, and claim a breeder's lien on the property for this amount. Subscribed in my presence and sworn to before me this day of , A.D. (year). Notarial Officer. My commission expires

Click to view

The secretary of state on presentation shall file this instrument in his office in the same manner as financing statements are required to be filed under the Uniform Commercial Code.

All breeders’ liens shall be released in the same manner as financing statements under the Uniform Commercial Code.

If the owner of the male animal does not wish to take advantage of W.S.

29-7-204

he may renew the lien in the same manner in which secured interests are renewed pursuant to the Uniform Commercial Code.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 74, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 2862; Laws 1907, ch. 59, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 3772; C.S. 1920, § 4821; R.S. 1931, § 66-302; C.S. 1945, § 56-1602; W.S. 1957, § 11-492; W.S. 1977, § 11-28-302; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 29-7-108; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 2; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 1999, ch. 150, § 2; 2004, ch. 24, § 1; 2011, ch. 113, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a), substituted “secretary of state” for “county clerk of the county in which the female animal or the offspring is held or pastured”; and, in (b), substituted “secretary of state” for “county clerk.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), substituted “Notarial Officer” for “Notary Public” in the notice.

§ 29-7-203.
Priority of liens.

The lien herein given is prior to and shall take precedence over any lien or encumbrance given subsequent to the service unless the lien is created pursuant to W.S.

29-8-102

relating to liens for the production of farm products under contracts executed, entered into, renewed or substantively amended after July 1, 2001.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 74, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 2863; C.S. 1910, § 3773; C.S. 1920, § 4822; R.S. 1931, § 66-303; C.S. 1945, § 56-1603; W.S. 1957, § 11-493; W.S. 1977, § 11-28-303; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 29-7-109; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 2; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2001, ch. 126, § 2.

§ 29-7-204.
Possession and sale of female animal or offspring by lien claimant.

At any time after default of payment for services rendered and within one (1) year after the service, the owner of the lien may take possession of any female animal or offspring upon which a lien exists in accordance with law and sell it as provided by W.S.

29-7-205

.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 74, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 2864; C.S. 1910, § 3774; C.S. 1920, § 4823; R.S. 1931, § 66-304; C.S. 1945, § 56-1604; W.S. 1957, § 11-494; W.S. 1977, § 11-28-304; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 29-7-110; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 2; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

§ 29-7-205.
Sale at auction; publication or posting of notice; contents thereof; new notice required in case of adjournment; lien claimant may purchase; bill of sale to be filed.

A sale shall be made at public auction. The lienholder shall first give ten (10) days notice in any newspaper published in the county where the notice of lien is filed. If no newspaper is published in the county the notice shall be posted for two (2) weeks in at least three (3) public places in the county, one (1) of which shall be at the front door of the courthouse. The notice shall:

Describe the animal or animals to be sold;

State the amount of money claimed to be due;

State when the services were rendered; and

State the exact time and place of the sale.

If for any reason it is necessary to adjourn the sale, new notices shall be given as in the first instance required.

A lien claimant is not prevented from purchasing at a sale because of his owning the lien on the animal sold.

The purchaser shall take from the person selling any female animal or offspring a bill of sale which shall contain the substance of the notice of sale, the date of sale and the consideration. The bill of sale shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state, and shall be provided to a Wyoming brand inspector upon a change of ownership inspection pursuant to W.S.

11-20-203

.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 74, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 2865; C.S. 1910, § 3775; C.S. 1920, § 4824; R.S. 1931, § 66-305; C.S. 1945, § 56-1605; W.S. 1957, § 11-495; W.S. 1977, § 11-28-305; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 29-7-111; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 2; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2004, ch. 24, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (d), substituted “secretary of state, and shall be provided to a Wyoming brand inspector upon a change of ownership inspection pursuant to W.S.

11-20-203

” for “county clerk where the notice of lien was filed.”

§ 29-7-206.
Sale at auction; offspring to be sold first; disposition of proceeds; remedies not exclusive.

If a female animal and her offspring are taken under a lien, the offspring shall be sold first. If the proceeds are sufficient to pay the expense incurred in taking possession under the lien, the filing fee and the costs of notices, then the female animal shall not be sold. After deducting the expense from the proceeds of any sale, the remainder of the proceeds, if any, shall be returned to the person entitled to them. The lien herein given shall not exclude any holder of a lien from abandoning it and recovering the amount due him by an action at law.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 74, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 2866; C.S. 1910, § 3776; C.S. 1920, § 4825; R.S. 1931, § 66-306; C.S. 1945, § 56-1606; W.S. 1957, § 11-496; W.S. 1977, § 11-28-306; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 29-7-112; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 2; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

§ 29-7-207.
Selling or removing encumbered property without lienholder's consent; penalty.

Any owner of a female animal or offspring on which a lien exists under W.S.

29-7-201

through

29-7-207

who disposes of any female animal or offspring before the lien expires or is satisfied or who removes the female animal or offspring with intent to deprive a lien claimant of his lien or with intent to damage an innocent purchaser, and does so without first having obtained the consent of the lienholder to the disposition is guilty of a misdemeanor. On conviction he may be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 74, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 2867; C.S. 1910, § 3777; C.S. 1920, § 4826; R.S. 1931, § 66-307; C.S. 1945, § 56-1607; W.S. 1957, § 11-497; W.S. 1977, § 11-28-307; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 29-7-113; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 2; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2004, ch. 24, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, deleted “out of the county in which the notice of lien is filed” following “the female animal or offspring.”